District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

6-263

Disposition of assets on dissolution.

Repealed.

Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-243, § 15, 42 DCR 91
May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-105, § 30, 47 DCR 1325
1981 Ed., § 5-133.
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 29 of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-259, February 9, 2000, 47 DCR 1129).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 29 of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-346, June 5, 2000, 47 DCR 4980).
Purpose of Law 10-243: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 6-251.